Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
13-329
County, city, village, or public utility;
donation of motor vehicle; conditions.

The governing body of a county, city,
village, or public utility may authorize the donation of any motor vehicle
that is owned by such county, city, village, or public utility, if the governing
body has determined that the motor vehicle has reached the end of its useful
life, to any charitable organization described in section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19)
of the Internal Revenue Code that is incorporated pursuant to the Nebraska
Nonprofit Corporation Act unless such donation is prohibited by law. The governing
body shall not authorize such donation if any employee of the charitable organization
or any proposed recipient of the motor vehicle from the charitable organization
is a family member of any member of the governing body. For purposes of this
section, family member means a spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild,
or grandparent by blood, marriage, or adoption.

Laws 2011, LB628, § 4.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.